New York, session 2025-2026, A2356.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivisions 1 and 2 of section 674-a of the labor law, as 2 added by chapter 105 of the laws of 2019, are amended to read to as 3 follows: 4 1. Wage board. The commissioner shall hereby convene a farm laborers 5 wage board. The wage board shall be comprised of [three] five members: 6 one representative of the farm bureau, one representative of the New 7 York State AFL-CIO, the commissioner of agriculture and markets, one 8 member appointed by the Dean of Cornell University's College of Agricul- 9 ture and Life Sciences (CALS) and one member appointed by the commis- 10 sioner, who shall be selected from the general public and designated as 11 chairperson. The wage board shall hold its first hearing no later than 12 March first, two thousand twenty. The members of the board shall not 13 receive a salary or other compensation, but shall be paid actual and 14 necessary traveling expenses while engaged in the performance of their 15 duties. 16 2. Organization. [Two-thirds] Three-fifths of the members of the board 17 shall constitute a quorum. The chairperson may from time to time formu- 18 late rules governing the manner in which the wage board shall function 19 and perform its duties under this article. 20 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 21 ing the date upon which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01819-01-5